Utah statutes.
78B-12-114.   County attorney to assist obligee.

(1)  The county attorney's office shall provide assistance to an obligee desiring to proceed under this chapter in the following manner:

(a)  provide forms, approved by the Judicial Council of Utah, for an order of wage assignment if the obligee is not represented by legal counsel;

(b)  inform the obligee of the right to file impecuniously if the obligee is unable to bear the expenses of the action and assist the obligee with such filing;

(c)  advise the obligee of the available methods for service of process; and

(d)  assist the obligee in expeditiously scheduling a hearing before the court.

(2)  The county attorney's office may charge a fee not to exceed $25 for providing assistance to an obligee under Subsection (1).



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

